Utah statutes.
70A-2a-212.   Implied warranty of merchantability.

(1)  Except in a finance lease, a warranty that the goods will be merchantable is implied in a lease contract if the lessor is a merchant with respect to goods of that kind.

(2)  To be merchantable, goods must be at least such as:

(a)  pass without objection in the trade under the description in the lease agreement;

(b)  in the case of fungible goods, are of fair average quality within the description;

(c)  are fit for the ordinary purposes for which goods of that type are used;

(d)  run, within the variation permitted by the lease agreement, of even kind, quality, and quantity within each unit and among all units involved;

(e)  are adequately contained, packaged, and labeled as the lease agreement may require; and

(f)  conform to any promises or affirmations of fact made on the container or label.

(3)  Other implied warranties may arise from course of dealing or usage of trade.

